Illinois, session 104th, HB571.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 5Section 25-1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-1)7    Sec. 25-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Sports Wagering Act. References in this Article to "this 9Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)